es: Tipo de puerto del teclado: PS/2; USB tipo A; USB tipo B; USB tipo C; Otros
sv: Tangentbordsporttyp: PS/2; USB typ-A; USB typ-B; USB typ-C; Övrigt
de: Tastaturanschlusstyp: PS/2; USB-Typ-A; USB-Typ-B; USB-Typ-C; Sonstiges
th: ประเภทพอร์ตแป้นพิมพ์: PS/2; USB Type-A; USB Type-B; USB Type-C; อื่นๆ
nl: Toetsenbordpoorttype: PS/2; USB type-A; USB type-B; USB type-C; Andere
fr: Type de port du clavier: PS/2; USB type A; USB type B; USB type C; Autre
lt-LT: Klaviatūros prievado tipas: PS/2; USB A tipo; USB B tipo; USB C tipo; Kita
it: Tipo di porta della tastiera: PS/2; USB tipo A; USB tipo B; USB tipo C; Altro
bg-BG: Тип порт на клавиатурата: PS/2; USB type-A; USB type-B; USB type-C; Други
en: Keyboard port type: PS/2; USB type-A; USB type-B; USB type-C; Other
hu: Billentyűzetport típusa: PS/2; USB-A; USB-B; USB-C; Egyéb
ko: 키보드 포트 유형: PS/2; USB 타입-A; USB 타입-B; USB 타입-C; 기타
sk-SK: Typ portu klávesnice: PS/2; USB typu A; USB typu B; USB typu C; Iné
fi: Näppäimistön porttityyppi: PS/2; USB tyyppi A; USB tyyppi B; USB tyyppi C; Muu
ru: Тип разъема клавиатуры: PS/2; USB Type-A; USB Type-B; USB Type-C; Другой
nb: Tastaturporttype: PS/2; USB type-A; USB type-B; USB type-C; Annet
el: Τύπος θύρας πληκτρολογίου: PS/2; USB type-C; USB type-B; USB type-C; Άλλο
da: Tastaturporttype: PS/2; USB type-A; USB type-B; USB type-C; Andet
ja: キーボードポートの種類: PS/2; USBタイプA; USBタイプB; USBタイプC; その他
hr-HR: Tip priključka tipkovnice: PS/2; USB tip-A; USB tip-B; USB tip-C; Ostalo
zh-TW: 鍵盤連接埠類型: 個人電腦連接埠; USB Type-A; USB Type-B; USB Type-C; 其他
ro-RO: Tip port tastatură: PS/2; USB tip A; USB tip B; USB tip C; Altele
pt-PT: Tipo de porta de teclado: PS/2; USB tipo A; USB tipo B; USB type-C; Outro
tr: Klavye Bağlantı Noktası Türü: PS/2; USB A tipi; USB B tipi; USB C tipi; Diğer
zh-CN: 键盘端口类型: PS/2; USB A 型; USB B 型; USB C 型; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta vrat tipkovnice: PS/2; USB tip-A; USB tip-B; USB tipa C; Drugo
cs: Typ portu klávesnice: PS/2; USB Type-A; USB Type-B; USB Type-C; Jiné
pt-BR: Tipo de porta do teclado: PS/2; USB tipo A; USB tipo B; USB tipo C; Outro
pl: Typ portu klawiatury: PS/2; USB typu A; USB typu B; USB typu C; Inne
vi: Loại cổng kết nối với bàn phím: PS/2; USB type-A; USB type-B; USB type-C; Khác